Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5804.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-27.3-100.1.4, 23-27.3-100.1.5, 23-27.3-107.0, 23-27.3-107.4
and 23-27.3-108.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled "State Building Code" are
hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-100.1.4. Appointment and qualifications of the committee.
(a) The building code standards committee shall be composed of twenty-five (25)
members, residents of the state who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent
of the senate. Eight (8) members are to be appointed for terms of one year each, seven (7) for a
term of two (2) years each, and ten (10) for terms of three (3) years each. Annually, thereafter, the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint members to the committee to
succeed those whose terms expired; the members to serve for terms of three (3) years each and until
their successors are appointed and qualified. Two (2) members shall be architects registered in the
state; three (3) shall be professional engineers registered in the state, one specializing in
mechanical, one specializing in structural, and one specializing in electrical engineering; one
landscape architect, registered in the state; one full-time certified electrical inspector; two (2) shall
be builders or superintendents of building construction; one shall be a public health official; one
shall be a qualified fire code official; two (2) shall be from the Rhode Island building trades council;
two (2) shall be from the Rhode Island Builders Association; one shall be a holder of Class “A”
electrician’s license; one shall be a master plumber; two (2) shall be from the general public; three
(3) shall be building officials in office, one from a municipality with a population of sixty thousand

(60,000) persons or more, one from a municipality with a population of over twenty thousand
(20,000) persons but less than sixty thousand (60,000), and one from a municipality with a
population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) persons; one shall be a minimum housing official
in office from one of the local municipalities; and two (2) residents of the state who shall be persons
with disabilities as defined in § 42-87-1.
(b) All members shall have no less than five (5) years practical experience in their
profession or business. The committee shall elect its own chairperson and may elect from among
its members such other officers as it deems necessary. Thirteen (13) A majority of the current
members of the board shall constitute a quorum and the vote of a majority vote of those present
shall be required for action or decision. The committee shall adopt rules and regulations for
procedure. The state building commissioner shall serve as the executive secretary to the committee.
The committee shall have the power, within the limits of appropriations provided therefor, to
employ such assistance as may be necessary to conduct business.
(c) Members of the committee shall be removable by the governor pursuant to § 36-1-7
and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or
fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
(d) The state housing and property maintenance code subcommittee shall be composed of
nine (9) members, residents of the state. Five (5) of these members are to be current members of
the state building code standards committee and are to be appointed by that committee. The four
(4) remaining members are to be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the
senate. The four (4) appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall
initially be appointed on a staggered term basis, one for one year, one for two (2) years, and two
(2) for three (3) years. Annually thereafter, the building code standards committee, and the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the subcommittee members, for
which they are respectively responsible, to succeed those whose terms have expired; the members
to serve for terms of three (3) years each and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Of
the members appointed by the committee, one shall be a full-time certified electrical inspector; one
shall be a master plumber and mechanical equipment expert; one shall be a builder or
superintendent of building construction; one member shall be a qualified state fire code official;
one shall be a property manager; and one shall be a current minimum housing official from a local
municipality. The four (4) members to be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent
of the senate, shall all be current minimum housing officials from local municipalities. One shall
be from a municipality with a population of sixty thousand (60,000) persons or more, two (2) from
municipalities with a population of over twenty thousand (20,000) persons but less than sixty
LC002164/SUB B - Page 2 of 9

thousand (60,000), and one from a municipality with a population of less than twenty thousand
(20,000) persons.
23-27.3-100.1.5. Building code — Adoption and promulgation by committee.
(a) The state building code standards committee has the authority to adopt, promulgate,
and administer a state building code, which shall include:
(a)(1) Provisions and amendments as necessary to resolve conflicts between fire safety
codes and building codes, as provided for in § 23-28.01-6; and
(b)(2) A rehabilitation building and fire code for existing buildings and structures.
(b) The building code may be promulgated in several sections, with a section applicable to
one- and: (1) one, two (2), three (3) and four (4)-family (2) dwellings using the International
Residential Code from the International Code Council ("ICC"); to and any amendments thereto
adopted by the state building code standards committee; (2) To multiple dwellings with more than
four (4) residential units, and hotels and motels and other commercial structures using the
Commercial International Building Code from the ICC; to and any amendments thereto adopted by
the state building code standards committee; and (3) To general building construction; to plumbing;
and to electrical.
(c) The building code shall incorporate minimum standards for the location, design,
construction, and installation of wells that are appurtenances to a building in applicable sections.
For purposes of this chapter, “appurtenance” includes the installation, alteration, or repair of wells
connected to a structure consistent with chapter 13.2 of title 46.
(d) The building code and the sections thereof shall be reasonably consistent with
recognized and accepted standards adopted by national model code organizations and recognized
authorities. To the extent that any state or local building codes, statutes, or ordinances are
inconsistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act, Title III, Public Accommodations and
Services Operated by Private Entities, 42 U.S.C. § 12181 et seq., and its regulations and standards,
they are hereby repealed. The state building code standards committee is hereby directed to adopt
rules and regulations consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act, Title II and III (28 C.F.R.
35 and 28 C.F.R. 36, as amended), as soon as possible, but no later than February 15, 2012, to take
effect on or before March 15, 2012. The state building code standards committee is hereby
authorized and directed to update those rules and regulations consistent with the future revisions of
the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Standards.
(e) All electrical work done in the state shall be in accordance with the latest edition of the
National Electrical Code (NEC). The state building commission code standards committee shall
adopt the latest edition of the NEC, including any amendments to the NEC by the commission
LC002164/SUB B - Page 3 of 9

committee. The adoption of the NEC by the commission shall be completed so that it will take
effect on the first day of July of the year the edition is dated.
23-27.3-107.0. State building code office. [Effective January 1, 2025.]
There exists within the department of business regulation a state building code office a
state building code office within the office of the state fire marshal, who is the head of the
department of business regulation's division of building, design, and fire professionals pursuant to
§ 23-28.2-1. The office is comprised of the state building code commissioner and, the
commissioner’s staff, the contractors’ registration and licensing board, the building code
commission standards committee, the design professionals unit, and the building code standards
committee registration boards for engineers, land surveyors, architects and landscape architects and
all other applicable subcommittees.
23-27.3-107.4. Qualifications of the state building commissioner. [Effective January
1, 2025.]
The state building code commissioner shall be a member of the classified service, and for
administrative purposes shall be assigned a position in the department of business regulation
regulation's division of building, design and fire professionals. Qualifications for the position of
the state building commissioner shall be established in accordance with provisions of the classified
service of the state, and shall include the provision that the qualifications include at least ten (10)
years’ experience in building or building regulations generally, and that the commissioner be an
architect or professional engineer licensed in the state or a certified building official presently or
previously employed by a municipality and having at least ten (10) years’ experience in the building
construction or inspection field.
23-27.3-108.2. Duties of the state building code commissioner. [Effective January 1,
2025.]
(a) The state building code commissioner shall have the authority to enforce and perform
the duties required by the state building code, chapter 27.3 of this title, and all codes referenced
therein and adopted thereunder, and all other provisions of the general laws and public laws insofar
as such powers and duties relate to building codes and building inspection; provided, however, that
for the purposes of this section structures constituting tents and/or membrane frame structures as
defined in this state building code and any regulations promulgated hereunder shall be subject to
an annual certification process to be established by the state building commissioner in conjunction
with the state fire marshal and shall not be subject to recurring permit and fee requirements as
otherwise required by this code.
(b) The state building code commissioner shall work to standardize building code
LC002164/SUB B - Page 4 of 9

interpretations across the state with input from the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns and
ensure consistent enforcement of the code throughout the state.
(c) Permit fees for the projects shall be established by the committee. The fees shall be
deposited as general revenues.
(d)(1) The local cities and towns shall charge each permit applicant an additional one-tenth
percent (0.1%) levy of the total construction cost for each commercial permit issued, and two-tenths
percent (0.2%) levy of the total construction cost for each residential permit issued. The levy shall
be limited to a maximum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each of the permits issued for one- and,
two (2), three (3) and four (4)-family (2) dwellings. This additional levy shall be transmitted
monthly to the state building code office at the department of business regulation; and
(i) Fifty percent (50%) of this additional levy on residential permits and one hundred
percent (100%) of this additional levy on commercial permits shall be used to staff and support the
purchase or lease and operation of a web-accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state
and municipalities for uniform, statewide electronic plan review, permit management, and
inspection system and other programs described in this chapter. This portion of the fee levy shall
be deposited as general revenues.
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) of this additional levy on residential permits shall be transferred to
the department of labor and training and shall be deposited into the contractor training restricted
receipt account, which shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27.
Subject to appropriation by the general assembly, these funds shall be used to provide residential
contractor training grants for programs that shall include, but are not limited to, minority business
enterprises and state local building officials.
(2) On or before July 1, 2013, the building commissioner shall develop a standard statewide
process for electronic plan review, permit management, and inspection. The process shall include,
but not be limited to: applications; submission of building plans and plans for developments and
plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection scheduling; project tracking; fee calculation
and collections; and workflow and report management.
(3) On or before December 1, 2013, the building commissioner, with the assistance of the
office of regulatory reform, shall implement the standard statewide process for electronic plan
review, permit management, and inspection. In addition, the building commissioner, through the
department of business regulation shall develop a technology and implementation plan for a
standard web-accessible service or system to be utilized by the state and municipalities for uniform,
statewide electronic plan review, permit management, and inspection. The plan shall include, but
not be limited to: applications; submission of building plans and plans for developments and plots;
LC002164/SUB B - Page 5 of 9

plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection scheduling; project tracking; fee calculation and
collections; and workflow and report management.
(e) All electronic permitting fees collected by the state building code office shall be
remitted to the department of business regulation, which funds shall be used to staff and support
the purchase or lease and operation of a web-accessible service or system to be utilized by the state
and municipalities for electronic permitting.
(f) The building commissioner shall, upon request by any state contractor described in §
37-2-38.1, review, and when all conditions for certification have been met, certify to the state
controller that the payment conditions contained in § 37-2-38.1 have been met.
(f)(g) The building commissioner shall coordinate the development and implementation of
this section with the state fire marshal to assist with the implementation of § 23-28.2-6. On or before
January 1, 2022, the building commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement
the provisions of this section and § 23-27.3-115.6.
(g)(h) The building commissioner shall submit, in coordination with the state fire marshal,
a report to the governor and general assembly on or before April 1, 2013, and each April 1
thereafter, providing the status of the web-accessible service and/or system implementation and
any recommendations for process or system improvement. In every report submitted on or after
April, 2024, the building commissioner shall provide the following information:
(1) The identity of every municipality in full compliance with the provisions § 23-27.3-
115.6 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(2) The identity of every municipality failing to fully implement and comply with the
provisions of § 23-27.3-115.6 and/or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of this section, and the nature, extent, and basis or reason for the failure or
noncompliance; and
(3) Recommendations to achieve compliance by all municipalities with the provisions of §
23-27.3-115.6 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.
(h)(i) The building commissioner shall assist with facilitating the goals and objectives set
forth in § 28-42-84(a)(9).
(i)(j) The state building code commissioner shall serve as the executive secretary to the
state building code standards committee.
(j)(k) In addition to the state building code commissioner’s other duties as set forth in this
chapter, and notwithstanding the same, the state building code commissioner and the
commissioner’s staff shall assume the authority for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of the
state building code in a municipality where there is no local building official or alternate as detailed
LC002164/SUB B - Page 6 of 9

in § 23-27.3-107.2, or where there are no local building inspectors.
SECTION 2. Section 23-28.2-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-28.2 entitled "Office of
State Fire Marshal" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-28.2-1. Establishment of office of the state fire marshal.
(a) There shall be an office of the state fire marshal within the department of business
regulation’s division of building, design and fire professionals, the head of which office shall be
the state fire marshal. The state fire marshal shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate and shall serve for a period of five (5) years. During the term the state fire
marshal may be removed from office by the governor for just cause. All authority, powers, duties
and responsibilities previously vested in the division of fire safety are hereby transferred to the
office of the state fire marshal.
(b) There exists, a state building code office within the office of the state fire marshal as
set forth in § 23-27.3-107.0.
SECTION 3. Section 42-35-2.9 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-35 entitled
"Administrative Procedures" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-35-2.9. Regulatory analysis.
(a) An agency shall prepare a regulatory analysis for a proposed rule. The analysis must be
completed before notice of the proposed rulemaking is published. The summary of the analysis
prepared under subsection (c) must be published with the notice of proposed rulemaking.
(b) A regulatory analysis must contain:
(1) An analysis of the benefits and costs of a reasonable range of regulatory alternatives
reflecting the scope of discretion provided by the statute authorizing the proposed rule;
(2) Demonstration that there is no alternative approach among the alternatives considered
during the rulemaking proceeding which would be as effective and less burdensome to affected
private persons as another regulation. This standard requires that an agency proposing to write any
new regulation must identify any other state regulation which is overlapped or duplicated by the
proposed regulation and justify any overlap or duplication; and
(3) A determination whether:
(i) The benefits of the proposed rule justify the costs of the proposed rule; and
(ii) The proposed rule will achieve the objectives of the authorizing statute in a more cost-
effective manner, or with greater net benefits, than other regulatory alternatives.
(iii) An agency preparing a regulatory analysis under this section shall prepare a concise
summary of the analysis.
(iv) If an agency has made a good-faith effort to comply with this section, a rule is not
LC002164/SUB B - Page 7 of 9

invalid solely if there are errors or paucity of data in the regulatory analysis for the proposed rule.
(c) The regulatory analysis for any amendments to the state fire safety code or the state
building code, or the state rehabilitation building and fire code for existing buildings and structures
including those amendments which incorporate and adopt by reference all or parts of a nationally
recognized model code shall be completed within one hundred fifty (150) days of the
recommendation of the passage of such amendments by the state official, agency or board
responsible for hearing and review of such amendments.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002164/SUB B
========
LC002164/SUB B - Page 8 of 9